Massachusetts, session 194th, S1703.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 7AA of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended in the first paragraph by inserting at the end thereof the following:-
The child passenger restraint shall comply with the United States Department of
Transportation's Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards 213 and shall be properly fastened and
secured according to the manufacturer's instructions. All infants and toddlers under the age of 2
years or weighing less than 30 pounds shall be restrained in a rear-facing car seat. It is hereby
declared to be the public policy of the commonwealth that all children who have outgrown their
rear-facing car seat by height and weight should use a forward-facing car seat with a harness up
to the maximum height and weight allowed by the child restraint manufacturer.
of 1